District of Columbia statutes.
42-1604

Joint tenant or tenant in common against cotenant.

Any joint tenant or tenant in common may maintain an action for waste committed by his cotenant, or in a suit for a partition, or a sale for purpose of partition may have said waste charged against the share of the cotenant committing the same.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1433, ch. 854, § 1622
1981 Ed., § 45-1204.
1973 Ed., § 45-1304.